Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202550-410
Legislative Council; meetings; quorum.

The council shall meet at least once in each biennium. One meeting of the entire council shall be held at the call of the chairperson of the Executive Board of the Legislative Council not less than thirty nor more than sixty days prior to the next regular session of the Legislature. Twenty-five members shall constitute a quorum, but a smaller number may meet and may compel the attendance of members in order to secure a quorum.

Laws 1937, c. 118, § 6, p. 423;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 50-506;

R.S.1943, § 50-410;

Laws 1949, c. 168, § 6, p. 446;

Laws 1951, c. 169, § 2, p. 655;

Laws 1965, c. 314, § 1, p. 876;

Laws 1969, c. 430, § 2, p. 1453;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 78.